Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,176
Purpose of act; limitation.

The purpose of the Tax Refund Setoff Act is to provide the Tax Commissioner with the authority to enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Internal Revenue to establish a reciprocal tax refund setoff system substantially similar to such act. The Tax Commissioner shall not enter into such agreement unless the Commissioner of Internal Revenue is authorized by federal law to enter into a substantially similar agreement offsetting delinquent state taxes.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 3.